Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1307.05
Intangible personal property held by life insurance corporation; presumed abandoned; when.

All intangible personal property distributable in the course of a demutualization or related reorganization of a life insurance corporation that remains unclaimed is presumed abandoned two years after the date of the distribution of the property.

Laws 2003, LB 424, § 2.